Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1913
Defective work; cessation; removal.

The plumbing inspector shall be required to stop any plumbing work not being done in accordance with the requirements of the rules and regulations of the plumbing board. The plumbing board shall have the power to cause plumbing to be removed, if, after notice to the owner or plumber doing the work, the plumbing board shall find the work or any part thereof to be defective.

Laws 1901, c. 21, § 11, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 5286;

C.S.1922, § 4509;

C.S.1929, § 19-313;

R.S.1943, § 19-313;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 128.